Massachusetts, session 194th, H3201.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
subsection (i) Section 6 of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012
Official Edition, is amended by inserting the following new subsection:-
Subsection (i1) For the safety and welfare of residents in Manufactured Housing
Communities in the Commonwealth, each resident shall receive a tax credit up to the sum of
$1,500 in order to remove oil tank(s) owned by them that are above ground and need
replacement due to the health and safety of said residency; such replacement must be according
to Massachusetts guidelines.
of 1